test.mk.dix
<pardef n="numeros">
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-ми</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-ма</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мо</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-ми</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-миот</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-миов</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мава</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мово</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-миве</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мион</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мана</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-моно</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,2-9]*[7,8]</re><p><l>-мине</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-те</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тиот</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тиов</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тава</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тово</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тиве</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тион</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тана</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тоно</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*[0,3,4,5,6,9]</re><p><l>-тине</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>


<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тиот</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тиов</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тава</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тово</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тиве</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тион</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тана</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тоно</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*11</re><p><l>-тине</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-та</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-то</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-ти</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тиот</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тата</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тото</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тите</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тиов</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тава</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тово</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тиве</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[0-9]*12</re><p><l>-тион</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

<e><par n="numeros"/></e>
